Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1084.
do enact as follows:AB1084,11Section 1. 49.43 (2x) of the statutes is created to read:AB1084,2,3249.43 (2x) “Dental therapist” means an individual licensed under s. 447.04 3(1m).AB1084,24Section 2. 49.46 (2) (b) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1084,2,6549.46 (2) (b) 1. (intro.) Dentists’ Dental services by a dentist or dental 6therapist, limited to basic services within each of the following categories:AB1084,37Section 3. 49.46 (2) (bo) of the statutes is created to read:AB1084,2,13849.46 (2) (bo) The department shall ensure that any Medical Assistance 9recipient that is referred by a health care provider for dental services under par. (b) 101. has the opportunity to be seen by the referred dentist or dental therapist no later 11than 30 days after the date of referral if the recipient is pregnant on the date of the 12referral or the recipient becomes pregnant prior to an appointment with the 13referred dentist or dental therapist.AB1084,2,1414